Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 1. Public and Private Land Use.

Sec. 38.04.005.
Policy.

In order to provide for maximum use of state land consistent with the public interest, it is the policy of the State of Alaska to plan and manage state-owned land to establish a balanced combination of land available for both public and private purposes. The choice of land best suited for public and private use shall be determined through the inventory, planning, and classification processes set out in AS

38.04.060

—

38.04.070

.

In classifying and making state land available for private use and settlement purposes, the director shall consider the natural resources and conditions present on the land and shall seek to minimize the adverse effect of private settlement on wildlife, fishery, mineral, timber, and other significant resources of the land; the director shall also make adequate provision for public open space which is accessible to communities so that natural areas are easily reached from all communities and settled areas. The amount of that land shall be sufficient to meet existing and projected needs for accessible public recreation land. Special care shall be taken to preserve public access to public water and to retain state ownership of sufficient land which combine high value for recreation and other public purposes with accessibility to settled areas. This classification for public purposes does not constitute dedication to open space, but the division’s management of land so classified shall be in a manner to preserve the identified values.

In allocating land for private use and public retention, the requirements of future generations shall be considered. To this end, a supply of state land of a variety of types and locations shall be reserved to provide an opportunity for future decisions.

Private land use rights are integral to the material well-being of the people of Alaska and our society.

The involvement of a proximately located municipality and of local residents is essential in classifying and making state land available for private use and settlement. The director shall, when appropriate, hold public meetings in the communities most affected by the disposal to solicit the views of the residents of the communities affected.

Land owned by the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska is not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 152 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.04.010.
Public interest in making land available for private use.

The primary public interest in conveying rights to state land surface to private parties is to make them available to individuals and other persons for direct use in areas classified as suitable for these purposes. In making state land available for private use, the director shall seek to guide year-round settlement to areas where public services already exist, or can be extended with reasonable economy, or where development of a viable economic base is probable.

State land that is located beyond the range of existing schools and other necessary public services, or that is located where development of sources of employment is improbable, may be made available for seasonal recreational purposes or for low density settlement. The seasonal recreation use or low density settlement shall have sufficient separation between residences so that public services will not be necessary or expected. The availability of timber, firewood, and water resources shall be considered in determining separation between residences. By considering the availability of timber, firewood, and water under this subsection or in making any disposal decision, the state does not by virtue of that consideration imply any right of the person receiving the disposal to an exclusive or other right to the timber, firewood, or water, that the state will not make any other disposals in the area, or that any disposals made will be limited in type or any other manner.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.

Sec. 38.04.015.
Public interest in retaining state land in public ownership.

The primary public interests in retaining areas of state land surface in public ownership are

to make them available on a sustained-yield basis for a variety of beneficial uses including subsistence, energy development, aquaculture, forestry, grazing, sport hunting and fishing, hiking, snowmobiling, skiing, and other activities of a type which can generally be made available to more people and conducted more successfully if the land is in public rather than private ownership;

to facilitate mining and mineral leasing by managing appropriate public land for surface uses which are compatible with subsurface uses;

to protect critical wildlife habitat and areas of special scenic, recreational, scientific, or other environmental concern;

to restrict development in hazardous locations such as floodplains and avalanche zones; and

to guide the location of settlement and development to minimize public costs and maximize social and economic benefits.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.